Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-917
New employee;
participation in another governmental plan; how treated.

Within the first one hundred eighty days of
employment, a school employee may apply to the board for eligibility and vesting
credit for years of participation in another Nebraska governmental plan, as
defined by section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code. During the years of
participation in the other Nebraska governmental plan, the employee must have
been a full-time or a part-time employee as defined in the Nebraska governmental
plan in which the credit was earned. Such credit shall not be included as
years of service in the benefit calculation. The board may adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations governing the assessment and granting of eligibility
and vesting credit.

Laws 1995, LB 501, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-1514.10;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 552;

Laws 2000, LB 1192, § 14;

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 25;

Laws 2013, LB263, § 15.